Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Req. No. 11308 Page 1

A. The Problem.
Research shows that unaddressed trauma can undermine children's
ability to learn, form relationships, and function appropriately in
the classroom. In the past, calling the Oklahoma Department of
Human Services statewide centralized hotline to make a mandated
child welfare report was one of the only tools in the first
responder's toolbox, but most children and teens do not meet the
criteria for a child welfare report. Consequently, many children
and teens are never identified, nor do they receive needed services,
and they linger in traumatic situations without adequate support.
These students have an increased risk for negative outcomes such as
poor academic performance, truancy, dropping out of school, and
delinquency.
B. The Handle With Care Oklahoma Program Purpose.
Handle With Care (HWC) Oklahoma is a program designed to enhance
existing cross-agency communication and partnership between local
law enforcement, community mental health services and supports, and
schools regarding children's exposure to traumatic events. The
"Handle With Care" approach enables first responders to start
building trust and positive connections with children and teens they
encounter at a traumatic scene and through an HWC notification,
local schools and mental health providers can provide trauma-
sensitive support immediately as needed. HWC Oklahoma is aimed at
ensuring that children who are exposed to crime, violence, and abuse
Req. No. 11308 Page 2

rece ive appropriate interventions so they can succeed in school to
the best of their ability. Children must feel safe in order to
learn.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.164 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Subject to the availability of funding pursuant to
subsection K of this section, the Oklahoma State Department of
Education shall implement and operate a Handle With Care (HWC)
Oklahoma program. HWC Oklahoma program efforts shall enhance
existing partnerships and collaborations with key partners such as,
but not limited to, state and local first responder agencies, school
districts, community coalitions, the State Department of Education,
the Department of Human Services, and the State Department of
Health. The HWC Oklahoma program shall enhance planning, training,
implementation, and sustainability in all counties in the state.
The program shall provide opportunities for local HWC programs to
receive support from the state as needed.
B. The HWC Oklahoma program shall enable a law enforcement
officer or employee of a law enforcement agency to notify the
program when a child, who may attend a public school or childcare
agency in the state, is exposed to a traumatic event, is at the
scene with a first responder, or another event occurs that may

Req. No. 11308 Page 3

affe ct his or her ability to succeed at school including, but not
limited to:
1. Domestic violence in the presence of the child;
2. Death of a member of the family or household of the child;
3. Arrest of a parent or guardian of the child affecting the
welfare of the child;
4. Search warrant is served in the residence of the child;
5. Drug or alcohol overdose of a child's family member;
6. Violence or mass shootings in the neighborhood where the
child resides;
7. Forced displacement from the residence;
8. House fire;
9. Child maltreatment; or
10. Child is present at a first responder encounter.
C. No later than November 1, 2027, the HWC Oklahoma program
shall coordinate with local communities and key partners to
administer a telephone hotline, email, or other appropriate method
to allow a law enforcement officer or first responder agency to
provide the notification described in subsection B of this section.
D. Information submitted to the HWC Oklahoma program in the
notification shall comply with the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation's dissemination laws and Oklahoma Victim's Bill of
Rights. It shall only include, to the extent that it is available:
1. The first, middle, and last name of the child;
Req. No. 11308 Page 4

2. The grade and school or childcare agency where the child is
enrolled; and
3. The date of birth and age of the child.
The HWC notification shall not include any details about the
traumatic event unless there is an imminent threat to the safety of
the child or school safety.
E. Upon receiving notification as provided in subsection D of
this section, HWC Oklahoma shall determine if the child attends a
public school or childcare agency in this state. If the child
attends a public school or childcare agency in the state, HWC
Oklahoma shall contact the local HWC multi-disciplinary team (MDT)
created in subsection F of this section, which shall notify
designated representatives where the child attends. The notice
shall include that "the child referenced has been exposed to a
traumatic event in the last twenty-four (24) hours and could exhibit
academic, emotional, and behavioral problems because of exposure to
a traumatic event. Please handle the child with care."
F. In coordination with HWC Oklahoma and the Oklahoma State
Department of Education, each school district board of education,
city, town, or municipal governing body, county commission, or other
political subdivision may develop a local HWC multi-disciplinary
team (MDT) for the political subdivision. The HWC MDT may meet as
frequently as needed and determined by the team lead. The team lead
for the HWC MDT shall be selected by members of the team and shall
Req. No. 11308 Page 5

have received trauma-informed training from the State Department of
Health, Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, or
other recognized trauma-informed training provider. The HWC MDT
members shall include, but not be limited to:
1. Employees of the local school districts;
2. Community advocates or clergy;
3. Youth services professionals; and
4. Members of local law enforcement.
G. 1. The Oklahoma State Department of Education, in
coordination with community coalitions and partner state and local
first responder agencies, shall provide model protocol and training
for the HWC Oklahoma program to first responder agencies and their
employees who may respond to a traumatic event involving a child.
2. The Oklahoma State Department of Education, in coordination
with community coalitions, shall include model protocol and training
for the HWC Oklahoma program in existing efforts which promote
universal trauma-informed practices in school settings.
H. The training required in subsection G of this section shall
include, at a minimum:
1. The criteria for sending an HWC notice;
2. The procedure for notifying the HWC program when a child who
may attend a public school or childcare agency is exposed to an
event listed in subsection B of this section that may affect his or

Req. No. 11308 Page 6

her ability to succeed at school and the information to include in
the notification;
3. Proper response to a notification received from the program,
including, without limitation, the manner in which to respond to a
notification through early interventions; and
4. Collaboration with teachers and other members of the staff
of a school, students, family members of students, multi-
disciplinary teams, other persons, and behavioral, social, and
health providers, as appropriate, to reduce the negative impact of
the traumatic event on the affected student, appropriate
interventions that may be available to assist the student, and the
overall well-being of the student. Community coalitions shall be
engaged to increase coordination of community services.
I. The Oklahoma State Department of Education may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section with feedback from
local first responder agencies, schools, and community coalitions.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a law
enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement agency to
provide notification pursuant to this section if the disclosure of
information may compromise an ongoing investigation.
K. In addition to any funds appropriated by the Legislature,
the HWC Oklahoma program shall apply for federal, state, local, and
private funds to support the HWC Oklahoma program.

Req. No. 11308 Page 7

L. The Oklahoma State Department of Education shall submit an
annual report of the HWC Oklahoma program's progress and outcomes,
including, but not limited to, the number of sent notices, and
impact on students and communities to the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives, President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma
State Senate, and the Governor.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11308 CMA 12/28/24















Req. No. 11308 Page 8